Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-382
Mutual association; conversion; effect.

Upon the issuance to any applicant of a certificate of conversion as provided in section 8-381, the corporate existence of the converting association shall not terminate, but such association shall be a continuation of the entity so converted and all property of the converted association, including its rights, titles, and interests in and to all property of whatever kind, whether real, personal, or mixed, things in action, and every right, privilege, interest, and asset of any conceivable value or benefit then existing, or pertaining to it, or which would inure to it, immediately, by operation of law and without any conveyance or transfer and without any further act or deed, shall vest in and remain the property of such converted applicant, and the same shall have, hold, and enjoy the same in its own right as fully and to the same extent as the same was possessed, held, and enjoyed by the converting applicant, and such converted association, upon issuance of the certificate of such conversion, shall continue to have and succeed to all the rights, obligations, and relations of the converting association. All pending actions and other judicial proceedings to which the converting association is a party shall not be abated or discontinued by reason of such conversion, but may be prosecuted to final judgment, order, or decree in the same manner as if such conversion had not been made, and such converted applicant may continue the actions in its new corporate name. Any judgment, order, or decree may be rendered for or against it which might have been rendered for or against the converting applicant theretofore involved in the proceedings.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 27.